sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX R Y 449
SFX R   rať         riem       [aeiou]rať is:1st_person
SFX R   rať         rieš       [aeiou]rať is:2nd_person
SFX R   rať         rie        [aeiou]rať is:3rd_person
SFX R   rať         rieme      [aeiou]rať is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   rať         riete      [aeiou]rať is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   rať         rú         [aeiou]rať is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   rať         rúc        [aeiou]rať is:participle
SFX R   rať         r          [aeiou]rať is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   rať         rme        [aeiou]rať is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   rať         rte        [aeiou]rať is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   rať         eriem      [^aeiou]rať is:1st_person
SFX R   rať         erieš      [^aeiou]rať is:2nd_person
SFX R   rať         erie       [^aeiou]rať is:3rd_person
SFX R   rať         erieme     [^aeiou]rať is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   rať         eriete     [^aeiou]rať is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   rať         erú        [^aeiou]rať is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   rať         erúc       [^aeiou]rať is:participle
SFX R   rať         er         [^aeiou]rať is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   rať         erme       [^aeiou]rať is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   rať         erte       [^aeiou]rať is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ďať         dím        ďať is:1st_person
SFX R   ďať         díš        ďať is:2nd_person
SFX R   ďať         dí         ďať is:3rd_person
SFX R   ďať         díme       ďať is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ďať         díte       ďať is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ďať         dia        ďať is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ďať         diac       ďať is:participle
SFX R   ďať         di         ďať is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   ďať         dime       ďať is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ďať         dite       ďať is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ňať         ním        ňať is:1st_person
SFX R   ňať         níš        ňať is:2nd_person
SFX R   ňať         ní         ňať is:3rd_person
SFX R   ňať         níme       ňať is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ňať         níte       ňať is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ňať         nia        ňať is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ňať         niac       ňať is:participle
SFX R   ňať         ň          ňať is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   ňať         ňme        ňať is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ňať         ňte        ňať is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ťať         tím        ťať is:1st_person
SFX R   ťať         tíš        ťať is:2nd_person
SFX R   ťať         tí         ťať is:3rd_person
SFX R   ťať         tíme       ťať is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ťať         títe       ťať is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ťať         tia        ťať is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ťať         tiac       ťať is:participle
SFX R   ťať         ti         ťať is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   ťať         time       ťať is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ťať         tite       ťať is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ať          ím         [^ďňrť]ať is:1st_person
SFX R   ať          íš         [^ďňrť]ať is:2nd_person
SFX R   ať          í          [^ďňrť]ať is:3rd_person
SFX R   ať          íme        [^ďňrť]ať is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ať          íte        [^ďňrť]ať is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ať          ia         [^ďňrť]ať is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ať          iac        [^ďňrť]ať is:participle
SFX R   žať         ž          žať is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   ať          me         [^ďňrť]ať is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ať          te         [^ďňrť]ať is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ať          al         ať is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   ať          al         ať is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   ať          al         ať is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   ať          ala        ať is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   ať          alo        ať is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   ať          ali        ať is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   iecť        ečiem      iecť is:1st_person
SFX R   iecť        ečieš      iecť is:2nd_person
SFX R   iecť        ečie       iecť is:3rd_person
SFX R   iecť        ečieme     iecť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   iecť        ečiete     iecť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   iecť        ečú        iecť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   iecť        ečúc       iecť is:participle
SFX R   iecť        eč         iecť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   iecť        ečme       iecť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   iecť        ečte       iecť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   cť          kol        iecť is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   cť          kol        iecť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   cť          kol        iecť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   cť          kla        iecť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   cť          klo        iecť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   cť          kli        iecť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   ĺcť         lčiem      ĺcť is:1st_person
SFX R   ĺcť         lčieš      ĺcť is:2nd_person
SFX R   ĺcť         lčie       ĺcť is:3rd_person
SFX R   ĺcť         lčieme     ĺcť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ĺcť         lčiete     ĺcť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ĺcť         lčú        ĺcť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ĺcť         lčúc       ĺcť is:participle
SFX R   ĺcť         lč         ĺcť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   ĺcť         lčme       ĺcť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ĺcť         lčte       ĺcť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   cť          kol        ĺcť is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   cť          kol        ĺcť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   cť          kol        ĺcť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   cť          kla        ĺcť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   cť          klo        ĺcť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   cť          kli        ĺcť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   cť          žem        ôcť is:1st_person
SFX R   cť          žeš        ôcť is:2nd_person
SFX R   cť          že         ôcť is:3rd_person
SFX R   cť          žme        ôcť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   cť          žeme       ôcť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   cť          žte        ôcť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   cť          žete       ôcť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   cť          žu         ôcť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ôcť         ohol       ôcť is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   ôcť         ohol       ôcť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   ôcť         ohol       ôcť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   ôcť         ohla       ôcť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   ôcť         ohlo       ôcť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   ôcť         ohli       ôcť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   edieť       iem        edieť is:1st_person
SFX R   edieť       ieš        edieť is:2nd_person
SFX R   edieť       ie         edieť is:3rd_person
SFX R   edieť       ieme       edieť is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   edieť       iete       edieť is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   edieť       edia       edieť is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   edieť       ediac      edieť is:participle
SFX R   edieť       edz        edieť is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   edieť       edzme      edieť is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   edieť       edzte      edieť is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   edieť       edel       edieť is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   edieť       edel       edieť is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   edieť       edel       edieť is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   edieť       edela      edieť is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   edieť       edelo      edieť is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   edieť       edeli      edieť is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   lieť        eliem      mlieť is:1st_person
SFX R   lieť        elieš      mlieť is:2nd_person
